en: Flavoured dietary supplements
sv: Kosttillskott med smak

en: Collagen supplements, Collagen
nl: Collageen
sv: Kollagen

en: Spirulina supplements, Spirulina
xx: Spirulina
bg: Спирулина
es: Espirulina, Spirulina
fr: Spiruline
it: Spirulina, Alga Spirulina
ru: Спирулина
zh: 螺旋藻

en: Chlorella supplements, Chlorella
xx: Chlorella

en: Vitamin supplements, Vitamins
bg: Витамини
ca: Suplement vitamínic
da: Vitamintilskud, Vitaminer
de: Vitamine
es: Suplementos vitamínicos, Vitaminas
fi: vitamiinit
fr: Compléments alimentaires vitamines, Complément alimentaire vitamine, Vitamines
hr: Vitamini
hu: Vitaminok
it: Vitamine
ja: ビタミン剤
nl: Vitamines
ro: Vitamine
ru: Витамины
sv: Vitamintillskott, Vitaminer
tr: Vitaminler
zh: 维生素

en: Vitamin B12 supplements, Vitamin B₁₂ supplements, B₁₂ vitamins, B12 vitamins
da: B₁₂-vitamintilskud, B12-vitamintilskud, B₁₂-vitaminer, B12-vitaminer
sv: B₁₂-vitamintillskott, B12-vitamintillskott, B₁₂-vitaminer, B12-vitaminer

en: Vitamin C supplements, C vitamins
da: C-vitamintilskud, C-vitaminer
sv: C-vitamintillskott, C-vitaminer

en: Vitamin D supplements, D vitamins
da: D-vitamintilskud, D-vitaminer
sv: D-vitamintillskott, D-vitaminer

en: Vitamin D3 supplements, Vitamin D₃ supplements, D₃ vitamins, D3 vitamins
da: D₃-vitamintilskud, D3-vitamintilskud, D₃-vitaminer, D3-vitaminer
sv: D₃-vitamintillskott, D3-vitamintillskott, D₃-vitaminer, D3-vitaminer

en: Mineral supplements, Minerals
da: Mineraltilskud
sv: Mineraltillskott

en: Calcium supplements, Calcium
ar: مكملات الكالسيوم
da: Kalciumtilskud, Calciumtilskud, Kalcium, Calcium
el: Συμπλήρωμα ασβεστίου
eo: Kalcia suplementoj
es: Suplemento de calcio
hy: Կալցիումի հավելումներ
ja: カルシウムサプリメント
or: କ୍ୟାଲସିଅମ ପରିପୂରକ
pt: Suplementos de cálcio
sl: Kalcijevo dopolnilo
sv: Kalciumtillskott, Calciumtillskott, Kalcium, Calcium
vi: Thuốc bổ sung calci
zh: 鈣補充劑

en: Iron supplements, Iron
ar: مكملات الحديد
da: Jerntilskud, Jern
de: Eisen-Präparate, Eisen
el: Συμπλήρωμα σιδήρου
es: Suplemento de hierro
fa: مکمل‌های آهن
fr: Fer
ht: Fè
id: Suplemen besi
it: Terapia marziale
kk: Құрамында темірі бар дәрілермен емдеу
ko: 철 보충제
lv: Dzelzs preparāti
ne: आइरन चक्की
nl: Staalpillen
nn: Jerntilskot
or: ଲୌହ ପରିପୂରକ
pl: Suplement diety z żelazem
pt: Suplementos de ferro
ru: Препараты железа
sv: Järntilskott, Järn
ta: இரும்புச் சத்து
tl: Uwit
tr: Demir takviyesi
vi: Bổ sung sắt
zh: 鐵劑

en: Magnesium supplements, Magnesium
da: Magnesiumtilskud, Magnesium
sv: Magnesiumtillskott, Magnesium

en: Zinc supplements, Zinc
da: Zinktilskud, Zink
sv: Zinktillskott, Zink

en: Multivitamin and mineral supplements, Multivitamins, Combined vitamin and mineral supplements, Vitamin mineral combinations
ar: متعدد الفيتامينات
bn: মাল্টিভিটামিন
eo: Multvitamina suplementoj
eu: Multibitamina
fa: مولتی ویتامین
fr: Compléments alimentaires multivitaminés, Complément alimentaire multivitaminé
ko: 종합비타민
mk: Мултивитамин
nl: Multivitamine
pt: Multivitamínico
ru: Поливитаминные препараты
sh: Multivitamin
sr: Multivitamin
th: มัลติวิตามิน
ur: کثیر الحیاتین
vi: Vitamin tổng hợp
zh: 复合维生素, 綜合維他命

en: Melatonin supplements, Melatonin
xx: Melatonin

en: Electrolyte powders
sv: Elektrolytpulver

en: Flavoured electrolyte powders
sv: Elektrolytpulver med smak

en: Appetite control
zh: 食欲控制产品

en: Salivary stimulants, Saliva stimulants
sv: Salivstimulanser